csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nizaaga'anziinaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: gizaaga'anziimwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: gizaaga'anziinaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [zaaga'anziidogena',zaaga'anziidogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'anziidogenag
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'anziidogenan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: zaaga'anziidog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nizaaga'anziiminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: gizaaga'anziiminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: zaaga'anziimwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nizaaga'aanaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: gizaaga'aamwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: gizaaga'aanaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [zaaga'amodogena',zaaga'amowidogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: [zaaga'amowidogenag,zaaga'amodogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: [zaaga'amowidogenan,zaaga'amodogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: [zaaga'amowidog,zaaga'amodog]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nizaaga'aaminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: gizaaga'aaminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: zaaga'aamwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'anziigwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'anziinigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: zaaga'anziigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'amogwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'aminigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: zaaga'amogoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [nizaaga'anzii,nizaaga'anziin]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: gizaaga'anziim
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [gizaaga'anzii,gizaaga'anziin]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [zaaga'anziiwa',zaaga'anziiwan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'anziiwag
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'anziiwan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [zaaga'anzii,zaaga'anziin]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nizaaga'anziimin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: gizaaga'anziimin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: zaaga'anziim
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nizaaga'am
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: gizaaga'aam
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: gizaaga'am
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [zaaga'amoo',zaaga'amoon]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'amoog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'amoon
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: zaaga'am
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nizaaga'aamin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: gizaaga'aamin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: zaaga'aam
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nizaaga'anziinaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: gizaaga'anziimwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: gizaaga'anziinaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [zaaga'anziibanii',zaaga'anziibaniin]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'anziibaniig
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'anziibaniin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: zaaga'anziiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nizaaga'anziiminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: gizaaga'anziiminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: zaaga'anziimwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nizaaga'aanaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: gizaaga'aamwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: gizaaga'aanaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [zaaga'amoobanii',zaaga'amoobaniin]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: zaaga'amoobaniig
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: zaaga'amoobaniin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: zaaga'amooban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nizaaga'aaminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: gizaaga'aaminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: zaaga'aamwaaban
